Idaho, session 2026, H0951.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho.
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Office of the Attorney General the
following amounts to be expended according to the designated programs for
personnel costs from the Consumer Protection Fund for the period July 1,
2026, through June 30, 2027:
FOR:
State Legal Services $910,000
Internet Crimes Against Children 70,000
TOTAL $980,000
SECTION 2. USE OF CONSUMER PROTECTION FUND FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the appro-
priation provided in Section 1 of this act is hereby appropriated for the
furtherance of the Attorney General's duties and activities pursuant to
Idaho law for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027.
SECTION 3. In addition to the appropriation made in Section 1, Chap-
ter 196, Laws of 2025, and any other appropriation provided by law, there
is hereby appropriated to the Office of the Attorney General the following
amounts to be expended according to the designated programs for personnel
costs from the Consumer Protection Fund for the period July 1, 2025, through
June 30, 2026:
FOR:
State Legal Services $910,000
Internet Crimes Against Children 70,000
TOTAL $980,000
SECTION 4. USE OF CONSUMER PROTECTION FUND FOR FISCAL YEAR 2026.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the appro-
priation provided in Section 3 of this act is hereby appropriated for the


furtherance of the Attorney General's duties and activities pursuant to
Idaho law for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 5. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, Sections 3 and 4 of this act shall be in full force and ef-
fect on and after passage and approval, and Sections 1 and 2 of this act shall
be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 2026.